Illinois, session 104th, HB4250.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995 is amended 5by changing Sections 10-5, 10-10, 10-25, 10-30, 10-35, 10-37, 610-38, 10-45, and 10-50 and by adding Section 10-24 as 7follows: 8    (35 ILCS 143/10-5)9    Sec. 10-5. Definitions. For purposes of this Act:10    "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or 11enterprise engaged in, at any location whatsoever, for the 12purpose of selling tobacco products.13    "Cigarette" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 14Section 1 of the Cigarette Tax Act.15    "Contraband little cigar" means: 16        (1) packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 17    little cigars that do not bear a required tax stamp under 18    this Act; 19        (2) packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 20    little cigars that bear a fraudulent, imitation, or 21    counterfeit tax stamp; 22        (3) packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 23    little cigars that are improperly tax stamped, including   HB4250- 2 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1    packages of little cigars that bear only a tax stamp of 2    another state or taxing jurisdiction; or 3        (4) packages of little cigars containing other than 20 4    or 25 little cigars in the possession of a distributor, 5    retailer or wholesaler, unless the distributor, retailer, 6    or wholesaler possesses, or produces within the time frame 7    provided in Section 10-27 or 10-28 of this Act, an invoice 8    from a stamping distributor, distributor, or wholesaler 9    showing that the tax on the packages has been or will be 10    paid. 11    "Correctional Industries program" means a program run by a 12State penal institution in which residents of the penal 13institution produce tobacco products for sale to persons 14incarcerated in penal institutions or resident patients of a 15State operated mental health facility.16    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Revenue.17    "Distributor" means any of the following:18        (1) Any manufacturer or wholesaler in this State 19    engaged in the business of selling tobacco products who 20    sells, exchanges, or distributes tobacco products to 21    retailers or consumers in this State.22        (2) Any manufacturer or wholesaler engaged in the 23    business of selling tobacco products from without this 24    State who sells, exchanges, distributes, ships, or 25    transports tobacco products to retailers or consumers 26    located in this State, so long as that manufacturer or   HB4250- 3 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1    wholesaler has or maintains within this State, directly or 2    by subsidiary, an office, sales house, or other place of 3    business, or any agent or other representative operating 4    within this State under the authority of the person or 5    subsidiary, irrespective of whether the place of business 6    or agent or other representative is located here 7    permanently or temporarily.8        (3) Any retailer who receives tobacco products on 9    which the tax has not been or will not be paid by another 10    distributor.11    "Distributor" does not include any person, wherever 12resident or located, who makes, manufactures, or fabricates 13tobacco products as part of a Correctional Industries program 14for sale to residents incarcerated in penal institutions or 15resident patients of a State operated mental health facility.16    "Electronic cigarette" means:17        (1) any device that employs a battery or other 18    mechanism to heat a solution or substance to produce a 19    vapor or aerosol intended for inhalation, except for (A) 20    any device designed solely for use with cannabis that 21    contains a statement on the retail packaging that the 22    device is designed solely for use with cannabis and not 23    for use with tobacco or (B) any device that contains a 24    solution or substance that contains cannabis subject to 25    tax under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 26    Program Act or the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act;  HB4250- 4 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1        (2) any cartridge or container of a solution or 2    substance intended to be used with or in the device or to 3    refill the device, except for any cartridge or container 4    of a solution or substance that contains cannabis subject 5    to tax under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 6    Program Act or the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act; or7        (3) any solution or substance, whether or not it 8    contains nicotine, intended for use in the device, except 9    for any solution or substance that contains cannabis 10    subject to tax under the Compassionate Use of Medical 11    Cannabis Program Act or the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 12    Act.13    The changes made to the definition of "electronic 14cigarette" by this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 15Assembly apply on and after June 28, 2019, but no claim for 16credit or refund is allowed on or after the effective date of 17this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly for such 18taxes paid during the period beginning June 28, 2019 and the 19effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 20Assembly.21    "Electronic cigarette" includes, but is not limited to, 22any electronic nicotine delivery system, electronic cigar, 23electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, electronic hookah, vape 24pen, or similar product or device, and any component or part 25that can be used to build the product or device. "Electronic 26cigarette" does not include: cigarettes, as defined in Section   HB4250- 5 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b11 of the Cigarette Tax Act; any product approved by the United 2States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco 3cessation product, a tobacco dependence product, or for other 4medical purposes that is marketed and sold solely for that 5approved purpose; any asthma inhaler prescribed by a physician 6for that condition that is marketed and sold solely for that 7approved purpose; or any therapeutic product approved for use 8under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act. 9    "Little cigar" means and includes any roll, made wholly or 10in part of tobacco, where such roll has an integrated 11cellulose acetate filter and weighs less than 4 pounds per 12thousand and the wrapper or cover of which is made in whole or 13in part of tobacco. 14    "Manufacturer" means any person, wherever resident or 15located, who manufactures and sells tobacco products, except a 16person who makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products 17as a part of a Correctional Industries program for sale to 18persons incarcerated in penal institutions or resident 19patients of a State operated mental health facility.20    Beginning on January 1, 2013, "moist snuff" means any 21finely cut, ground, or powdered tobacco that is not intended 22to be smoked, but shall not include any finely cut, ground, or 23powdered tobacco that is intended to be placed in the nasal 24cavity. 25    "Nicotine" means any form of the chemical nicotine, 26including any salt or complex, regardless of whether the   HB4250- 6 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1chemical is naturally or synthetically derived, and includes 2nicotinic alkaloids and nicotine analogs. 3    "Person" means any natural individual, firm, partnership, 4association, joint stock company, joint venture, limited 5liability company, or public or private corporation, however 6formed, or a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee, 7conservator, or other representative appointed by order of any 8court.9    "Place of business" means and includes any place where 10tobacco products are sold or where tobacco products are 11manufactured, stored, or kept for the purpose of sale or 12consumption, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, 13or vending machine.14    "Prior continuous compliance taxpayer" means any person 15who is licensed under this Act and who, having been a licensee 16for a continuous period of 2 years, is determined by the 17Department not to have been either delinquent or deficient in 18the payment of tax liability during that period or otherwise 19in violation of this Act. "Prior continuous compliance 20taxpayer" also means any taxpayer who has, as verified by the 21Department, continuously complied with the condition of his 22bond or other security under provisions of this Act for a 23period of 2 consecutive years. In calculating the consecutive 24period of time described in this definition for qualification 25as a prior continuous compliance taxpayer, a consecutive 26period of time of qualifying compliance immediately prior to   HB4250- 7 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 2Assembly shall be credited to any licensee who became licensed 3on or before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 4103rd General Assembly. A distributor that is a prior 5continuous compliance taxpayer and becomes a successor to a 6distributor as the result of an acquisition, merger, or 7consolidation of that distributor shall be deemed to be a 8prior continuous compliance taxpayer with respect to the 9acquired, merged, or consolidated entity. 10    "Remote retail sale" means any sale of tobacco products to 11a consumer that satisfies any of the following:12        (1) The consumer submits the order for the sale by 13    telephone, a method of voice transmission, mail, or the 14    Internet or other online service, or the seller is 15    otherwise not in the physical presence of the consumer 16    when the order or request for purchase is made.17        (2) The tobacco product is delivered to the consumer 18    by common carrier, private delivery service, or other 19    method of remote delivery, or the seller is not in the 20    physical presence of the consumer when the consumer 21    obtains possession of the tobacco product.22    "Remote retail seller" means a person located inside or 23outside of this State who makes remote retail sales.24    "Retailer" means any person in this State engaged in the 25business of selling tobacco products to consumers in this 26State, regardless of quantity or number of sales.  HB4250- 8 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1    "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter in any 2manner or by any means whatsoever for a consideration and 3includes all sales made by persons.4    "Stamp" or "stamps" mean the indicia required to be 5affixed on a package of little cigars that evidence payment of 6the tax on packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 little 7cigars under Section 10-10 of this Act. These stamps shall be 8the same stamps used for cigarettes under the Cigarette Tax 9Act. 10    "Stamping distributor" means a distributor licensed under 11this Act and also licensed as a distributor under the 12Cigarette Tax Act or Cigarette Use Tax Act. 13    "Tobacco products" means any product that is made from or 14derived from tobacco that is intended for human consumption or 15is likely to be consumed, including but not limited to cigars, 16including little cigars; cheroots; stogies; periques; 17granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other 18smoking tobacco; snuff (including moist snuff) and snuff 19flour; cavendish; plug and twist tobacco; fine-cut and other 20chewing tobaccos; shorts; refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings, 21and sweeping of tobacco; snus; shisha and tobacco for use in 22waterpipes; and other kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in 23such manner as to be suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe 24or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking or for 25inhalation, absorption, or ingesting by any other means; but 26does not include cigarettes as defined in Section 1 of the   HB4250- 9 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1Cigarette Tax Act or tobacco purchased for the manufacture of 2cigarettes by cigarette distributors and manufacturers defined 3in the Cigarette Tax Act and persons who make, manufacture, or 4fabricate cigarettes as a part of a Correctional Industries 5program for sale to residents incarcerated in penal 6institutions or resident patients of a State operated mental 7health facility.8    Beginning on July 1, 2019, "tobacco products" also 9includes electronic cigarettes. 10    Beginning July 1, 2025, "tobacco products" also includes 11any product that is made from or derived from tobacco, or that 12contains nicotine whether natural or synthetic, that is 13intended for human consumption or is likely to be consumed, 14including but not limited to nicotine pouches, lozenges, and 15gum; and other kinds and forms of nicotine prepared in such 16manner as to be suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe or 17otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking or for inhalation, 18absorption, or ingesting by any other means. 19    "Tobacco products" does not include any product that has 20been approved by the United States Food and Drug 21Administration for sale as a tobacco or smoking cessation 22product, a nicotine replacement therapy product, or for other 23medical purposes where that product is marketed and sold 24solely for such approved use, including but not limited to 25spray or inhaler prescribed by a physician, chewing gum, skin 26patches, or lozenges.   HB4250- 10 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1    "Wholesale price" means the established list price for 2which a manufacturer sells tobacco products to a distributor, 3before the allowance of any discount, trade allowance, rebate, 4or other reduction. In the absence of such an established list 5price, the manufacturer's invoice price at which the 6manufacturer sells the tobacco product to unaffiliated 7distributors, before any discounts, trade allowances, rebates, 8or other reductions, shall be presumed to be the wholesale 9price.10    "Wholesaler" means any person, wherever resident or 11located, engaged in the business of selling tobacco products 12to others for the purpose of resale. "Wholesaler", when used 13in this Act, does not include a person licensed as a 14distributor under Section 10-20 of this Act unless expressly 15stated in this Act. 16(Source: P.A. 103-1001, eff. 8-9-24; 104-6, eff. 7-1-25.) 17    (35 ILCS 143/10-10)18    Sec. 10-10. Tax imposed. 19    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section with 20respect to little cigars, on the first day of the third month 21after the month in which this Act becomes law, a tax is imposed 22on any person engaged in business as a distributor of tobacco 23products, as defined in Section 10-5, and, beginning on July 241, 2026, any person engaged in business as a remote retail 25seller of tobacco products, as defined in Section 10-5, at the   HB4250- 11 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1rate of (i) 18% of the wholesale price of tobacco products sold 2or otherwise disposed of to retailers or consumers located in 3this State prior to July 1, 2012; (ii) 36% of the wholesale 4price of tobacco products sold or otherwise disposed of to 5retailers or consumers located in this State beginning on July 61, 2012 and through June 30, 2025; except that, beginning on 7January 1, 2013 and through June 30, 2025, the tax on moist 8snuff shall be imposed at a rate of $0.30 per ounce, and a 9proportionate tax at the like rate on all fractional parts of 10an ounce, sold or otherwise disposed of to retailers or 11consumers located in this State; and except that, beginning 12July 1, 2019 and through June 30, 2025, the tax on electronic 13cigarettes shall be imposed at the rate of 15% of the wholesale 14price of electronic cigarettes sold or otherwise disposed of 15to retailers or consumers located in this State; and (iii) 45% 16of the wholesale price of tobacco products, including moist 17snuff and electronic cigarettes, sold or otherwise disposed of 18to retailers or consumers located in this State on and after 19July 1, 2025; and except that, beginning on July 1, 2026, the 20tax on tobacco products, including moist snuff and electronic 21cigarettes, sold or otherwise disposed of to retailers or 22consumers located in this State by a remote retail seller 23shall be imposed at the rate of 45% of the wholesale price. The 24tax is in addition to all other occupation or privilege taxes 25imposed by the State of Illinois, by any political subdivision 26thereof, or by any municipal corporation. However, the tax is   HB4250- 12 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1not imposed upon any activity in that business in interstate 2commerce or otherwise, to the extent to which that activity 3may not, under the Constitution and Statutes of the United 4States, be made the subject of taxation by this State, and 5except that, beginning July 1, 2013, the tax on little cigars 6shall be imposed at the same rate, and the proceeds shall be 7distributed in the same manner, as the tax imposed on 8cigarettes under the Cigarette Tax Act. The tax is also not 9imposed on sales made to the United States or any entity 10thereof.11    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Section, 12stamping distributors of packages of little cigars containing 1320 or 25 little cigars sold or otherwise disposed of in this 14State shall remit the tax by purchasing tax stamps from the 15Department and affixing them to packages of little cigars in 16the same manner as stamps are purchased and affixed to 17cigarettes under the Cigarette Tax Act, unless the stamping 18distributor sells or otherwise disposes of those packages of 19little cigars to another stamping distributor. Only persons 20meeting the definition of "stamping distributor" contained in 21Section 10-5 of this Act may affix stamps to packages of little 22cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars. Stamping 23distributors may not sell or dispose of little cigars at 24retail to consumers or users at locations where stamping 25distributors affix stamps to packages of little cigars 26containing 20 or 25 little cigars.   HB4250- 13 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1    (c) The impact of the tax levied by this Act is imposed 2upon distributors engaged in the business of selling tobacco 3products to retailers or consumers in this State. Whenever a 4stamping distributor brings or causes to be brought into this 5State from without this State, or purchases from without or 6within this State, any packages of little cigars containing 20 7or 25 little cigars upon which there are no tax stamps affixed 8as required by this Act, for purposes of resale or disposal in 9this State to a person not a stamping distributor, then such 10stamping distributor shall pay the tax to the Department and 11add the amount of the tax to the price of such packages sold by 12such stamping distributor. Payment of the tax shall be 13evidenced by a stamp or stamps affixed to each package of 14little cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars. 15    Stamping distributors paying the tax to the Department on 16packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars 17sold to other distributors, wholesalers or retailers shall add 18the amount of the tax to the price of the packages of little 19cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars sold by such stamping 20distributors. 21    (d) Beginning on January 1, 2013, the tax rate imposed per 22ounce of moist snuff may not exceed 15% of the tax imposed upon 23a package of 20 cigarettes pursuant to the Cigarette Tax Act. 24    (e) All moneys received by the Department under this Act 25from sales occurring prior to July 1, 2012 shall be paid into 26the Long-Term Care Provider Fund of the State Treasury. Of the   HB4250- 14 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1moneys received by the Department from sales occurring on or 2after July 1, 2012, except for moneys received from the tax 3imposed on the sale of little cigars, 50% shall be paid into 4the Long-Term Care Provider Fund and 50% shall be paid into the 5Healthcare Provider Relief Fund. Beginning July 1, 2013, all 6moneys received by the Department under this Act from the tax 7imposed on little cigars shall be distributed as provided in 8Section 2 of the Cigarette Tax Act. Of the moneys received by 9the Department under this Act from sales occurring on or after 10July 1, 2025, except for moneys received from the tax imposed 11on the sale of little cigars, the first $5,000,000 collected 12in each fiscal year shall be paid into the Tobacco Settlement 13Recovery Fund for tobacco health initiatives at the Department 14of Public Health, and the remainder of the moneys collected in 15each fiscal year shall be paid as follows: 50% shall be paid 16into the Long-Term Care Provider Fund; and 50% shall be paid 17into the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund. 18(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 7-1-25.) 19    (35 ILCS 143/10-24 new)20    Sec. 10-24. Remote retail seller's license. Beginning on 21July 1, 2026, it shall be unlawful for any person to engage in 22business as a remote retail seller within the meaning of this 23Act without first having obtained a license to do so from the 24Department. Application for that license shall be made to the 25Department, by electronic means, in a form prescribed by the   HB4250- 15 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1Department. The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 2Section. 3    (35 ILCS 143/10-25)4    Sec. 10-25. License actions. 5    (a) The Department may, after notice and a hearing, 6revoke, cancel, or suspend the license of any distributor, or 7retailer, or remote retail seller who violates any of the 8provisions of this Act, fails to keep books and records as 9required under this Act, fails to make books and records 10available for inspection upon demand by a duly authorized 11employee of the Department, or violates a rule or regulation 12of the Department for the administration and enforcement of 13this Act. The notice shall specify the alleged violation or 14violations upon which the revocation, cancellation, or 15suspension proceeding is based.16    (b) The Department may revoke, cancel, or suspend the 17license of any distributor for a violation of the Tobacco 18Products Manufacturers' Escrow Enforcement Act of 2003 as 19provided in Section 30 of that Act.20    (c) If the retailer has a training program that 21facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 22Department shall suspend for 3 days the license of that 23retailer for a fourth or subsequent violation of the 24Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and 25Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in   HB4250- 16 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1subsection (a) of Section 2 of that Act. For the purposes of 2this Section, any violation of subsection (a) of Section 2 of 3the Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age 4and Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act occurring at 5the retailer's licensed location, during a 24-month period, 6shall be counted as a violation against the retailer.7    If the retailer does not have a training program that 8facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 9Department shall suspend for 3 days the license of that 10retailer for a second violation of the Prevention of Tobacco 11Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 12of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of 13Section 2 of that Act.14    If the retailer does not have a training program that 15facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 16Department shall suspend for 7 days the license of that 17retailer for a third violation of the Prevention of Tobacco 18Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 19of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of 20Section 2 of that Act.21    If the retailer does not have a training program that 22facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 23Department shall suspend for 30 days the license of a retailer 24for a fourth or subsequent violation of the Prevention of 25Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and 26Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in   HB4250- 17 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1subsection (a-5) of Section 2 of that Act. 2    A training program that facilitates compliance with 3minimum-age tobacco laws must include at least the following 4elements: (i) it must explain that only individuals displaying 5valid identification demonstrating that they are 21 years of 6age or older shall be eligible to purchase cigarettes or 7tobacco products and (ii) it must explain where a clerk can 8check identification for a date of birth. The training may be 9conducted electronically. Each retailer that has a training 10program shall require each employee who completes the training 11program to sign a form attesting that the employee has 12received and completed tobacco training. The form shall be 13kept in the employee's file and may be used to provide proof of 14training.15    (d) The Department may, by application to any circuit 16court, obtain an injunction restraining any person who engages 17in business as a distributor of or remote retail seller 18tobacco products without a license (either because the his or 19her license has been revoked, canceled, or suspended or 20because of a failure to obtain a license in the first instance) 21from engaging in that business until that person, as if that 22person were a new applicant for a license, complies with all of 23the conditions, restrictions, and requirements of Section 2410-20 or Section 10-24 of this Act and qualifies for and 25obtains a license. Refusal or neglect to obey the order of the 26court may result in punishment for contempt.  HB4250- 18 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 2    (35 ILCS 143/10-37)3    Sec. 10-37. Proof of payment of tax imposed by this Act. 4Every licensed distributor of tobacco products in this State 5is required to show proof of the tax having been paid as 6required by this Act by displaying its Tobacco Products 7License number on every sales invoice issued to a retailer in 8this State. No retailer shall possess tobacco products without 9either a proper invoice indicating that the tobacco products 10tax was paid by a distributor for the tobacco products in the 11retailer's possession or other proof that the tax was paid by 12the retailer if it has purchased tobacco products on which tax 13has not been paid as required by this Act. Failure to comply 14with the provisions of this paragraph may be grounds for 15revocation of a distributor's, remote retail seller's, or 16retailer's license in accordance with Section 10-25 of this 17Act or Section 6 of the Cigarette Tax Act. In addition, the 18Department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for 19the first violation and $3,000 for each subsequent violation, 20which shall be deposited into the Tax Compliance and 21Administration Fund.22(Source: P.A. 100-940, eff. 8-17-18.) 23    (35 ILCS 143/10-38)24    Sec. 10-38. Presumption for unlicensed distributors,   HB4250- 19 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1remote retail sellers, or persons. Whenever any person obtains 2tobacco products from an unlicensed in-state or out-of-state 3distributor, remote retail seller, or person, a prima facie 4presumption shall arise that the tax imposed by this Act on 5such tobacco products has not been paid in violation of this 6Act. Invoices or other documents kept in the normal course of 7business in the possession of a person reflecting purchases of 8tobacco products from an unlicensed in-state or out-of-state 9distributor, remote retail seller, or person or invoices or 10other documents kept in the normal course of business obtained 11by the Department from in-state or out-of-state distributors, 12remote retail sellers, or persons, are sufficient to raise the 13presumption that the tax imposed by this Act has not been paid. 14If a presumption is raised, the Department may assess tax, 15penalty, and interest on the tobacco products. In addition, 16any person who violates this Section is liable to pay to the 17Department, for deposit in the Tax Compliance and 18Administration Fund, a penalty of $1,000 for the first 19violation and $3,000 for any subsequent violation. The 20Department may adopt rules to administer the penalties under 21this Section.22(Source: P.A. 100-940, eff. 8-17-18.) 23    (35 ILCS 143/10-45)24    Sec. 10-45. Incorporation by reference. All of the 25provisions of Sections 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5h,   HB4250- 20 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b15i, 5j, 6, 6a, 6b, 6c, 8, 9, 10, 11, 11a, and 12 of the 2Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and all applicable provisions 3of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act that are not 4inconsistent with this Act, apply to distributors and remote 5retail sellers of tobacco products to the same extent as if 6those provisions were included in this Act. References in the 7incorporated Sections of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act to 8retailers, to sellers, or to persons engaged in the business 9of selling tangible personal property mean distributors or 10remote retail sellers when used in this Act. References in the 11incorporated Sections to sales of tangible personal property 12mean sales of tobacco products when used in this Act.13    All of the provisions of Sections 7, 8, 8a, 16, 18a, 18b, 1418c, 22, 23, 24, 26, 27, and 28a of the Cigarette Tax Act which 15are not inconsistent with this Act shall apply, as far as 16practicable, to the subject matter of this Act to the same 17extent as if those provisions were included in this Act. 18References in the incorporated Sections to sales of cigarettes 19mean sales of little cigars in packages of 20 or 25 little 20cigars. 21(Source: P.A. 98-273, eff. 8-9-13.) 22    (35 ILCS 143/10-50)23    Sec. 10-50. Violations and penalties. When the amount due 24is under $300, any distributor or remote retail seller who 25fails to file a return, willfully fails or refuses to make any   HB4250- 21 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1payment to the Department of the tax imposed by this Act, or 2files a fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a 3corporation engaged in the business of distributing or 4engaging in remote retail sales of tobacco products to 5retailers or and consumers located in this State who signs a 6fraudulent return filed on behalf of the corporation, or any 7accountant or other agent who knowingly enters false 8information on the return of any taxpayer under this Act is 9guilty of a Class 4 felony.10    Any person who violates any provision of Section 10-20, 1110-21, or 10-22, or 10-24 of this Act, fails to keep books and 12records as required under this Act, or willfully violates a 13rule or regulation of the Department for the administration 14and enforcement of this Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony. A 15person commits a separate offense on each day that he or she 16engages in business in violation of Section 10-20, 10-21, or 1710-22, or 10-24 of this Act. If a person fails to produce the 18books and records for inspection by the Department upon 19request, a prima facie presumption shall arise that the person 20has failed to keep books and records as required under this 21Act. A person who is unable to rebut this presumption is in 22violation of this Act and is subject to the penalties provided 23in this Section. 24    When the amount due is under $300, any person who accepts 25money that is due to the Department under this Act from a 26taxpayer for the purpose of acting as the taxpayer's agent to   HB4250- 22 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1make the payment to the Department, but who fails to remit the 2payment to the Department when due, is guilty of a Class 4 3felony.4    Any person who violates any provision of Sections 10-20, 510-21 and 10-22 of this Act, fails to keep books and records as 6required under this Act, or willfully violates a rule or 7regulation of the Department for the administration and 8enforcement of this Act is guilty of a business offense and may 9be fined up to $5,000. If a person fails to produce books and 10records for inspection by the Department upon request, a prima 11facie presumption shall arise that the person has failed to 12keep books and records as required under this Act. A person who 13is unable to rebut this presumption is in violation of this Act 14and is subject to the penalties provided in this Section. A 15person commits a separate offense on each day that he or she 16engages in business in violation of Sections 10-20, 10-21 and 1710-22 of this Act. 18    When the amount due is $300 or more, any distributor or 19remote retail seller who files, or causes to be filed, a 20fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a corporation 21engaged in the business of distributing or engaging in remote 22retail sales of tobacco products to retailers or and consumers 23located in this State who files or causes to be filed or signs 24or causes to be signed a fraudulent return filed on behalf of 25the corporation, or any accountant or other agent who 26knowingly enters false information on the return of any   HB4250- 23 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1taxpayer under this Act is guilty of a Class 3 felony.2    When the amount due is $300 or more, any person engaged in 3the business of distributing or engaging in remote retail 4sales of tobacco products to retailers or and consumers 5located in this State who fails to file a return, willfully 6fails or refuses to make any payment to the Department of the 7tax imposed by this Act, or accepts money that is due to the 8Department under this Act from a taxpayer for the purpose of 9acting as the taxpayer's agent to make payment to the 10Department but fails to remit such payment to the Department 11when due is guilty of a Class 3 felony.12    When the amount due is under $300, any retailer who fails 13to file a return, willfully fails or refuses to make any 14payment to the Department of the tax imposed by this Act, or 15files a fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a 16corporation engaged in the retail business of selling tobacco 17products to purchasers of tobacco products for use and 18consumption located in this State who signs a fraudulent 19return filed on behalf of the corporation, or any accountant 20or other agent who knowingly enters false information on the 21return of any taxpayer under this Act is guilty of a Class A 22misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 4 felony for each 23subsequent offense. 24    When the amount due is $300 or more, any retailer who fails 25to file a return, willfully fails or refuses to make any 26payment to the Department of the tax imposed by this Act, or   HB4250- 24 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1files a fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a 2corporation engaged in the retail business of selling tobacco 3products to purchasers of tobacco products for use and 4consumption located in this State who signs a fraudulent 5return filed on behalf of the corporation, or any accountant 6or other agent who knowingly enters false information on the 7return of any taxpayer under this Act is guilty of a Class 4 8felony. 9    Any person whose principal place of business is in this 10State and who is charged with a violation under this Section 11shall be tried in the county where his or her principal place 12of business is located unless he or she asserts a right to be 13tried in another venue. If the taxpayer does not have his or 14her principal place of business in this State, however, the 15hearing must be held in Sangamon County unless the taxpayer 16asserts a right to be tried in another venue.17    Any taxpayer or agent of a taxpayer who with the intent to 18defraud purports to make a payment due to the Department by 19issuing or delivering a check or other order upon a real or 20fictitious depository for the payment of money, knowing that 21it will not be paid by the depository, is guilty of a deceptive 22practice in violation of Section 17-1 of the Criminal Code of 232012.24    A prosecution for a violation described in this Section 25may be commenced within 3 years after the commission of the act 26constituting the violation.  HB4250- 25 -LRB104 16477 SPS 29872 b1(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 100-940, eff. 8-17-18.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 32026.